Maryland, session 2026, HB0966.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
2–205.
(a) In addition to the other powers granted and duties imposed under this article,
the State Board has the powers and duties set forth in this section.
(d) The State Board may institute legal proceedings to enforce:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0966*

HOUSE BILL 966
(1) The provisions of this article that are within its jurisdiction; and
(2) The bylaws, rules, and regulations adopted by the Board.
(e) (1) Without charge and with the advice of the Attorney General, the State
Board shall explain the true intent and meaning of the provisions of:
(i) This article that are within its jurisdiction; and
(ii) The bylaws, rules, and regulations adopted by the Board.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph [(4)] (5) of this subsection and in Title
6, Subtitles 4 and 5 of this article, the Board shall decide all controversies and disputes
under these provisions.
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, AN APPEALS PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE STATE BOARD MAY NOT
EXCEED 90 DAYS FOR THE APPEAL OF AN ACTION TAKEN BY A COUNTY BOARD
REGARDING THE REMOVAL OF:
1. THE COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT; OR
2. A MEMBER OF THE COUNTY BOARD.
(II) THE APPEALS PROCESS UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH MAY EXCEED 90 DAYS IF:
1. DUE PROCESS DEMANDS THE EXTENSION; OR
2. THE STATE BOARD DETERMINES THAT AN
EXTENSION IS NECESSARY FOR THE IMMEDIATE PRESERVATION OF THE PUBLIC
HEALTH OR SAFETY.
[(3)] (4) The decision of the Board is final.
[(4)] (5) (i) The Public Employee Relations Board shall decide any
controversy or dispute arising under Title 6, Subtitle 4 or Subtitle 5 of this article.
(ii) A decision of the Public Employee Relations Board is final.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.